Maine, session 132, LD1831.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3, is
amended to read:
10. Cannabis establishment. "Cannabis establishment" means a cultivation facility,
a products manufacturing facility, a testing facility, a cannabis store or, a sample collector
or a micro cannabis facility licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 2. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§41-A is enacted to read:
41-A. Micro cannabis facility. "Micro cannabis facility" means a facility licensed
under this chapter to cultivate adult use cannabis, manufacture adult use cannabis and adult
use cannabis products and sell adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products and other
products to consumers in accordance with section 504-B.
Sec. 3. 28-B MRSA §201, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2019, c. 676, §5 and PL
2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
4. Cannabis store. Consistent with the restrictions of section 205, subsection 2,
paragraph C, a A cannabis store license; or
Sec. 4. 28-B MRSA §201, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 676, §5, is amended
to read:
5. Sample collector. Consistent with the requirements and restrictions of section 205,
subsection 2, paragraph B and section 503‑A, a sample collector license.; or
Sec. 5. 28-B MRSA §201, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Micro cannabis facility. Consistent with the requirements and restrictions of
section 504-B, a micro cannabis facility license.
Sec. 6. 28-B MRSA §207, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Fees for micro cannabis facilities. For a micro cannabis facility license, the
office shall require payment of an application fee of $500 and a license fee of not more
than $2,500.
Sec. 7. 28-B MRSA §504-B is enacted to read:
§504-B. Operation of micro cannabis facilities
A micro cannabis facility must be operated in accordance with the provisions of this
section and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.
1. Cultivation of adult use cannabis, immature cannabis plants and seedlings.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a micro cannabis facility
license allows for cultivation of not more than 1,000 square feet of plant canopy. A micro
cannabis facility may, without obtaining a separate cultivation facility license or nursery
cultivation facility license:
A. Sell and distribute cultivated adult use cannabis to products manufacturing
facilities, cannabis stores, cultivation facilities and other micro cannabis facilities
subject to the same requirements and restrictions applicable to cultivation facilities
pursuant to section 501 and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter regarding the
operation of cultivation facilities;
Page 1 - 132LR1998(01)

B. Sell cultivated immature cannabis plants and seedlings to consumers subject to the
same requirements and restrictions applicable to nursery cultivation facilities pursuant
to section 501, subsection 3 and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter regarding
the operation of nursery cultivation facilities; and
C. Sell cultivated adult use cannabis, immature cannabis plants and seedlings to
consumers subject to the same requirements and restrictions applicable to cannabis
stores pursuant to section 504 and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter regarding
the operation of cannabis stores.
2. Manufacture of adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a micro cannabis facility
may, without obtaining a separate products manufacturing facility license, manufacture
adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products for:
A. Sale and distribution to cannabis stores, products manufacturing facilities and other
micro cannabis facilities subject to the same requirements and restrictions applicable
to products manufacturing facilities pursuant to section 502 and the rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter regarding the operation of products manufacturing facilities;
and
B. Sale to consumers subject to the same requirements and restrictions applicable to
cannabis stores pursuant to section 504 and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter
regarding the operation of cannabis stores.
3. Retail sale of adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a micro cannabis facility
may, without obtaining a separate cannabis store license, sell adult use cannabis, immature
cannabis plants, seedlings and adult use cannabis products to consumers subject to the same
requirements and restrictions applicable to cannabis stores pursuant to section 504 and the
rules adopted pursuant to this chapter regarding the operation of cannabis stores.
4. Tracking. In accordance with the requirements of section 105, a micro cannabis
facility licensee shall track:
A. All adult use cannabis the licensee cultivates from immature cannabis plant to the
point at which the cannabis plant or the cannabis produced by the cannabis plant is
delivered or transferred by the licensee to a cultivation facility, a products
manufacturing facility, a testing facility, a cannabis store or another micro cannabis
facility, is sold directly to a consumer or is disposed of or destroyed;
B. All adult use cannabis the licensee uses in the licensee's manufacturing processes
from the point at which the cannabis is delivered or transferred to the micro cannabis
facility, if applicable, by a cultivation facility or another micro cannabis facility to the
point at which the cannabis or cannabis concentrate or an adult use cannabis product
produced using the cannabis or cannabis concentrate is delivered or transferred to a
products manufacturing facility, a testing facility, a cannabis store or another micro
cannabis facility, is sold directly to a consumer or is disposed of or destroyed; and
C. All adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products from the point at which the
cannabis or cannabis products are delivered or transferred to the micro cannabis
facility, if applicable, by a cultivation facility, a products manufacturing facility or
another micro cannabis facility to the point at which the cannabis or cannabis products
Page 2 - 132LR1998(01)

415 are sold to a consumer, are delivered or transferred to a testing facility, are returned to
426 a cultivation facility, a products manufacturing facility or another micro cannabis
437 facility from which the cannabis or cannabis products were received or are disposed of
448 or destroyed.
If a micro cannabis facility licensee receives a return of a cannabis plant, cannabis flower,
cannabis trim or an adult use cannabis product from a cultivation facility, a products
manufacturing facility, a cannabis store or another micro cannabis facility, the licensee
shall track the returned cannabis plant, cannabis flower, cannabis trim or adult use cannabis
product to the point at which the return is transferred to a cultivation facility, a products
manufacturing facility, a testing facility, a cannabis store or another micro cannabis facility,
is sold directly to a consumer or is disposed of or destroyed.
5. Excise tax; sales tax. Notwithstanding Title 36, chapter 723 or any other provision
of law to the contrary, adult use cannabis sold by a micro cannabis facility licensee that
cultivates and sells adult use cannabis pursuant to subsection 1 is not subject to the tax
imposed on the sale of adult use cannabis pursuant to Title 36, chapter 723. A micro
cannabis facility licensee that sells adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products to a
consumer pursuant to subsection 3 shall ensure that the tax imposed on the sale of adult use
cannabis and adult use cannabis products to a consumer pursuant to Title 36, section 1811
is collected and remitted in accordance with the requirements of Title 36, Part 3 and the
rules adopted pursuant to Title 36, Part 3.
6. Rules. The office shall adopt rules regulating the licensure and operation of micro
cannabis facilities under this chapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major
substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.